apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>یێەه‍وووۆنملڵگککقڤفغعش‌سژزڕردخحچجتھهپبئا</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="top"        c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"        c="Antonym"/>
    <sdef n="np"        c="Proper Noun"/>
    <sdef n="cm"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="guio"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="lpar"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="rpar"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="lquot"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="rquot"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="clt"   c="Clitic"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="post"       c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"       c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pst"       c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="ezalos"       c="Loose ezafet"/>
    <sdef n="ezaclo"       c="Close ezafet"/>
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="abs"      c="Absolute"/>
    <sdef n="emph"      c="Emphatic"/>
    <sdef n="ind"       c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"       c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="det"       c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"       c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="pers"       c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="num"       c="Number"/>
    <sdef n="ord"       c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="p1"       c="Number"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Number"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="qst"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="sp"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Number"/>
    <sdef n="px1sg"       c="Possessor"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg"       c="Possessor"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg"       c="Possessor"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"       c="Possessor"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl"       c="Possessor"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl"       c="Possessor"/>
    <sdef n="pro"       c="With Pronominal Clitic"/>
    <sdef n="iv"       c="Intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="tv"       c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="neg"       c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="ques"       c="Question particle"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"       c="Lexical verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbcop"       c="Copula"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="pri"       c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="imp"       c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="prs"       c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="past"       c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="perf"       c="Present Perfect"/>
    <sdef n="sent"     c="End-of-sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[۰۱۲۳٤۵٦۷۸۹]+([.,][۰۱۲۳٤۵٦۷۸۹]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«“]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»”]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[؟\?;:…]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[.!]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>–</l><r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>،</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



   <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="بوون__clt_cons">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یت</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ین</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بوون__clt_voc">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یت</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یە</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ین</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ھەبوون__vbhaver">
	<e><p><l>ھەیە</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ھەبوو</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ھەبووە</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ھەبوون</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ھەنەبوو</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ھەنەبووە</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ھەنەبوون</l><r>ھەبوون<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بوون__vb">

      <e><p><l>نیم</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نیی</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نییت</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>نییە</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نیە</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نیین</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نین</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نین</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>بوو</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>بوون</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نەبوو</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="past"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<!-- Present Perfect -->
      <e><p><l>بووە</l><r>بوون<s n="vbcop"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ھەبوون"><i></i><par n="ھەبوون__vbhaver"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="guio"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
